Massachusetts, session 194th, S1644.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of Chapter 6E of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
official edition, is hereby amended by striking the first sentence in Section 2 and replacing it
with; “There shall be a Massachusetts Peace Officer Standards and Training Commission
consisting of 11 members:” and adding to the last sentence of the first paragraph in Section 2 of
Chapter 6E; “and 2 of whom shall be appointed by the Massachusetts District Attorney’s
Association, 1 of whom shall be a sworn member of the Department of State Police who is
appointed from a list of 2 nominations submitted by the President of the State Police Association
of Massachusetts, and 1 of whom shall be a Juvenile Diversion Program professional appointed
from a list of 2 nominations approved by a majority of the Board of the Massachusetts District
Attorney’s Association.”
of 1